District of Columbia statutes.
2-1431.08

Rulemaking and interagency agreements.

(a)

The Mayor shall promulgate rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this unit. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules by resolution within this 30-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

No later than 3 months after March 8, 2007, the Mayor shall issue rules which shall assign specified functions to agencies under Titles I, II, III, and IV of the ADA and shall establish a process for regular interagency meetings of the agencies with assigned specified functions. The rules shall, at a minimum, address the functions specified in section IV-B of Mayor’s Order 2006-58, issued on May 23, 2006.

(c)

All agencies assigned specific functions under the rules described in subsection (b) of this section shall enter into a Memorandum of Agreement (“MOA”) or a Memorandum of Understanding (“MOU”) with the Office of Disability Rights. Each MOA or MOU shall describe operational and communication procedures for interaction with the Office.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-239, § 9, 54 DCR 404
Title I, II, III, and IV of ADA is classified as 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.